Wyoming, session 2025, HB0252.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-22-105(b) is repealed.

Section 2. The three (3) year tax exemption provided
in W.S. 39‑22‑105(b), repealed by section 1 of this act,
shall apply in accordance with the terms of that repealed
subsection to any wind turbine that first produced
electricity for sale before the effective date of this act.
HB0252

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0423

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0252